Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,130
Effect of affidavit.

(a) A successor named in an affidavit under section 30-24,129 shall have the same protection as a distributee who has received a deed of distribution from a personal representative as provided in section 30-24,106.

(b) A purchaser of real property from or lender to a person named as a successor in an affidavit under section 30-24,129 shall have the same protection as a person purchasing from or lending to a distributee who has received a deed of distribution from a personal representative as provided in section 30-24,108.

(c) Nothing in this section affects or prevents any proceeding to enforce any mortgage, pledge, or other lien upon the real property described in the affidavit.

Laws 1999, LB 100, § 3.